Mississippi, session 2026, HB250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-227, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-227.  (1)  * * *[Effective July 1, 2023 to December 31, 2023].  The poll managers shall be each entitled to Seventy‑five Dollars ($75.00) for each election; however, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the poll managers an additional amount not to exceed One Hundred Twenty‑five Dollars ($125.00) per election. (1)[Effective from and after January 1, 2024].  The poll managers shall be each entitled to One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($125.00) for each election; however, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the poll managers an additional amount not to exceed Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) per election. (2)  The poll manager who * * *shall carry carries to the place of voting, away from the courthouse, the official ballots, ballot boxes, pollbooks and other necessities, shall be allowed up to Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each voting precinct for * * *so doing that service.  The poll manager who acts as returning officer shall be allowed up to Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each voting precinct for that service.  If a person who performs the duties described in this subsection uses a privately owned motor vehicle to perform them, he or she shall receive for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in excess of ten (10) miles, the mileage reimbursement rate allowable to federal employees for the use of a privately owned vehicle while on official travel.  If the registrar requires any poll manager or other person who was present at the voting precinct to return to the registrar's office after the polls close on the day of the election, then that person shall receive for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in excess of ten (10) miles, the mileage reimbursement rate allowable to federal employees for the use of a privately owned vehicle while on official travel to the registrar's office. (3)  The compensation authorized in this section shall be allowed by the board of supervisors, and shall be payable out of the county treasury. (4)  The compensation provided in this section shall constitute payment in full for the services rendered by the persons named for any election, whether there be one (1) election or issue voted upon, or more than one (1) election or issue voted upon at the same time. (5)  The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary to ensure the safety of poll managers, election commissioners, electors and their families at the voting precincts during a COVID-19 public health risk or other public health risk declared by the Governor where the appearance of such persons may result in exposure to such risk or the exposure of other persons to such risk. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.